Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-258
Town funds; general expenditures authorized.

The following shall be deemed town charges: The compensation of town officers for services rendered their respective towns, contingent expenses necessarily incurred for the use and benefit of the town, the money authorized by the vote of the town meeting for any town purposes, and every sum directed by law to be raised for town purposes.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 57, p. 147;

R.S.1913, § 1042;

C.S.1922, § 944;

C.S.1929, § 26-258;

R.S.1943, § 23-258.

In counties under township organization, duty to keep ordinary township highways and culverts in repair is imposed on township. Goes v. Gage County, 67 Neb. 616, 93 N.W. 923 (1903).